apertium-dan.dan.dix
<pardef n="pen/ny__n">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>cene</l>      <r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nyerne</l>     <r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ce</l>        <r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nyer</l>      <r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ny</l>        <r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nyen</l>      <r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ny</l>        <r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="of/fer__n">
  <e>       <p><l>rene</l>      <r>fer<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>fer<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>feret</l>     <r>fer<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fer</l>       <r>fer<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="mod/us__n">
  <e>       <p><l>iene</l>      <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>usen</l>      <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\'__case"/></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="love__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
   <e r="RL">       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="UH__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="meter__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="papyr/us__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ussene</l>     <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>usser</l>      <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ussen</l>      <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\'__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ene</l>       <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>er</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>en</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="peer__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="karbon__n">
   <e r="RL">        <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="id/é_no-cp__n">
  <e>       <p><l>eerne</l>      <r>é<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="no-cp\Ø\s__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eer</l>       <r>é<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp\Ø\s__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>een</l>       <r>é<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="no-cp\Ø\s__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>é</l>         <r>é<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp\Ø\s__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="idé">                       <i>idé</i><par n="id/é_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="jacket">                    <i>jacket</i><par n="peer__n"/></e>
<e lm="karbon">                    <i>karbon</i><par n="karbon__n"/></e>
<e lm="kilometer">       <i>kilometer</i><par n="meter__n"/></e>
<e lm="konsensus">                 <i>konsens</i><par n="papyr/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="kvadratkilometer">          <i>kvadratkilometer</i><par n="meter__n"/></e>
<e lm="kvant">                     <i>kvant</i><par n="UH__n"/></e>
<e lm="love">                      <i>love</i><par n="love__n"/></e>
<e lm="modus">                     <i>mod</i><par n="mod/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="offer">                     <i>of</i><par n="of/fer__n"/></e>
<e lm="dødsoffer">                     <i>dødsof</i><par n="of/fer__n"/></e>
<e lm="penny">                     <i>pen</i><par n="pen/ny__n"/></e>
<e lm="sengetøj">                  <i>sengetøj</i><par n="UH__n"/></e>
<e lm="ciffer">                    <i>cif</i><par n="of/fer__n"/></e>
<e lm="stimulus">                  <i>stimul</i><par n="mod/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="cyklus">                    <i>cykl</i><par n="papyr/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="undertøj">                  <i>undertøj</i><par n="UH__n"/></e>
<e lm="badesalt"><i>badesalt</i><par n="UH__n"/></e>
<e lm="dept"><i>dept</i><par n="UH__n"/></e>
<e lm="deciliter"><i>deciliter</i><par n="meter__n"/></e>
<e lm="decimeter"><i>decimeter</i><par n="meter__n"/></e>
<e lm="drawback"><i>drawback</i><par n="peer__n"/></e>
<e lm="evergreen"><i>evergreen</i><par n="peer__n"/></e>
<e lm="grovsalt"><i>grovsalt</i><par n="UH__n"/></e>
<e lm="havsalt"><i>havsalt</i><par n="UH__n"/></e>
<e lm="hektoliter"><i>hektoliter</i><par n="meter__n"/></e>
<e lm="karbon"><i>karbon</i><par n="karbon__n"/></e>
<e lm="lugtesalt"><i>lugtesalt</i><par n="UH__n"/></e>
<e lm="milliliter"><i>milliliter</i><par n="meter__n"/></e>
<e lm="modus"><i>mod</i><par n="mod/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="nattøj"><i>nattøj</i><par n="UH__n"/></e>
<e lm="pantry"><i>pantry</i><par n="UH__n"/></e>
<e lm="havsalt"><i>havsalt</i><par n="UH__n"/></e>
<e lm="snavsetøj"><i>snavsetøj</i><par n="UH__n"/></e>
<e lm="slagteoffer"><i>slagteof</i><par n="of/fer__n"/></e>
